Wisconsin, session 2025, AB334.
do enact as follows:AB334,11Section 1. 84.01 (35) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB334,2,7284.01 (35) (b) Except as provided in par. (d) (c), and notwithstanding any 3other provision of this chapter or ch. 82, 83, or 85, the department shall give due 4consideration to establishing ensure that bikeways and pedestrian ways are 5established in all new highway construction and reconstruction projects funded in 6whole or in part from state funds or federal funds appropriated under s. 20.395 or 720.866.AB334,28Section 2. 84.01 (35) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB334,2,11984.01 (35) (c) The department shall promulgate rules identifying exceptions 10to the requirement under par. (b), but these rules may provide for an exception only 11if any of the following applies:AB334,3,2122. The cost of establishing bikeways or pedestrian ways would be excessively 13disproportionate to the need or probable use of the bikeways or pedestrian ways. 14For purposes of this subdivision, cost is excessively disproportionate if it exceeds 20 15percent of the total project cost. The rules may not allow an exception under this 16subdivision to be applied unless the secretary of transportation, or a designee of the 17secretary who has knowledge of the purpose and value of bicycle and pedestrian 1accommodations, reviews the applicability of the exception under this subdivision 2to the particular project at issue.AB334,3,433. Establishing bikeways or pedestrian ways would have excessive negative 4impacts in a constrained environment.AB334,3,654. There is an absence of need for the bikeways or pedestrian ways, as 6indicated by sparsity of population, traffic volume, or other factors.AB334,3,875. The community where pedestrian ways are to be located refuses to accept 8an agreement to maintain them.AB334,39Section 3. 84.01 (35) (d) (intro.) and 2. of the statutes are repealed.AB334,410Section 4. 84.01 (35) (d) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 84.01 (35) (c) 1.AB334,3,1111